Utah statutes.
7-24-304.   Civil liability.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to limit any civil liability that may exist against a title lender for:

(1)  breach of contract;

(2)  violation of federal law; or

(3)  other unlawful act.



Enacted by Chapter 236, 2003 General Session

